Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-815
State Advisory Committee on Substance Abuse Services; created; members; termination; duties.

(1) The State Advisory Committee on Substance Abuse Services is created. The State Advisory Committee on Substance Abuse Services terminates on July 1, 2026. Members of the committee shall have a demonstrated interest and commitment and specialized knowledge, experience, or expertise relating to the provision of substance abuse services in the State of Nebraska. The committee shall consist of twelve members appointed by the Governor and shall include at least three consumers of substance abuse services.

(2) The committee shall be responsible to the division and shall (a) conduct regular meetings, (b) provide advice and assistance to the division relating to the provision of substance abuse services in the State of Nebraska, (c) promote the interests of consumers and their families, (d) provide reports as requested by the division, and (e) engage in such other activities as directed or authorized by the division.

(3) This section terminates on July 1, 2026.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 15;

Laws 2005, LB 551, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 94;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 36.